District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.23

Reporting.

Beginning on January 1, 2011, and every 6 months thereafter, the Mayor shall provide the following information, delineated by month, to the Council, the:

(1)

Number of households participating in the District’s cash assistance TANF programs;

(2)

Number of households participating in SNAP;

(3)

Number of homeless households participating in SNAP;

(4)

Number of households who left the District’s cash assistance TANF programs, including the reasons they left;

(5)

Number of households who left SNAP, including the reasons they left; and

(6)

Number of SNAP participants who are self-employed.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5084, 57 DCR 6242

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5084 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).